Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202561-210
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Cash Fund is created. The State Treasurer shall credit to such fund such money as is specifically appropriated or reappropriated by the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall also credit such fund with payments, if any, accepted for services rendered by the department, including the Chief Water Officer, and fees collected pursuant to subsection (6) of section 46-606 and section 61-209. The funds made available to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment by the United States, through the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the Department of Agriculture or through any other agencies, shall be credited to the fund by the State Treasurer. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall allocate money from the fund to pay costs of the programs or activities of the department, including the programs or activities of the Chief Water Officer. The Director of Administrative Services, upon receipt of proper vouchers approved by the department, shall issue warrants on the fund, and the State Treasurer shall countersign and pay from, but never in excess of, the amounts to the credit of the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

Laws 1937, c. 8, § 13, p. 109;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1913;

R.S.1943, § 2-1547;

Laws 1959, c. 6, § 25, p. 90;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 28, p. 2358;

Laws 1973, LB 188, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 29, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 403, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1999, § 2-1547;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 26;

Laws 2002, LB 458, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 81;

Laws 2007, LB701, § 26;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 336.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.